California statutes. Education Code
(c) The county board of supervisors shall compute for the reorganized districts an annual tax rate for bond interest and redemption that will include the bond interest and redemption on the outstanding bonded indebtedness specified in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b), or the amount determined pursuant to a method prescribed under Section 35738. The county board of supervisors shall also compute tax rates for the annual charge and use charge prescribed by former Sections 1822.2 and 1825, as they read on July 1, 1970, when those charges were established before November 23, 1970. All of those tax rates shall be levied in excess of any other ad valorem property tax authorized or required by law, and shall not be included in the computation of the limitation specified in subdivision (a) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 186, Sec. 16.   (AB 2659)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

35577.

Whenever a school district having authorized but unsold bonds is completely divided between two or more new or acquiring districts so that the original district ceases to exist, pursuant to any provision of this chapter, the board of supervisors shall, before the date the action is effective for the purposes of Section 35534, make and enter an order in the minutes of its proceedings that the authorization to issue the unsold bonds be divided between each new or acquiring district in the ratio that the assessed valuation of the reorganized territory included in each school district bears to the total assessed valuation of the former district. The bonds, if issued by any new or acquiring district, shall be considered a liability of the school district for purposes of
 computing the bonding capacity of the school district when applying the State School Building Aid Law of 1952 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 16000) of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 186, Sec. 17.   (AB 2659)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

35578.

Any unsold bonds of an elementary, high, or unified school district that is included as a whole in a new or acquiring district through any kind of reorganization may be issued by the board of supervisors in the name of the new or acquiring district and the proceeds derived upon the sale thereof shall be the funds of the new or acquiring district. However, the proceeds derived upon the sale thereof shall be expended only for the purpose, or purposes, for which those bonds were authorized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 186, Sec. 18.   (AB 2659)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

35579.

Any unsold bonds of an elementary, high, or unified school district that is included as a whole in a new or acquiring district through any kind of reorganization, if issued by the board of supervisors in the names of the former districts shall be considered a liability of the new or acquiring district for purposes of computing the bonding capacity of the school district when applying the State School Building Aid Law of 1952 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 16000) of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 186, Sec. 19.   (AB 2659)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Formation of the Wiseburn Unified School District, Bonded Indebtedness, and Revenue Limit [35580. - 35586.]

35580.

Notwithstanding Article 8 (commencing with Section 35570), this article shall apply to the reorganization of the Wiseburn School District and the Centinela Valley Union High School District by the formation of the Wiseburn Unified School District and the termination of the Wiseburn School District. This article determines the liability for taxation, the bonding capacity, the permitted use of existing bond proceeds, and the allocation of authorized but unsold bonds of the Wiseburn Unified School District and the Centinela Valley Union High School District, and applies to the activities of the Local Public Schools Funding Authority, a joint powers authority created by the Wiseburn School District and the Centinela Valley Union High School District or the Wiseburn Unified School District
 and the Centinela Valley Union High School District.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 730, Sec. 1.   (SB 477)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

35581.

(a) Any tax for repayment of bonds of the Wiseburn School District shall be levied on all taxable property of the Wiseburn Unified School District.

(b) Any tax for repayment of bonds issued by the Wiseburn Unified School District, including bonds authorized by the Wiseburn School District, shall be levied on all taxable property of the Wiseburn Unified School District.

(c) Commencing with the fiscal year that begins on the effective date of the reorganization of the Wiseburn School District by the formation of the Wiseburn Unified School District, any tax for repayment of voter approved bonds of the Centinela Valley Union High School
 District approved before January 1, 2012, shall be levied on both of the following:

(1) All taxable property located within the Centinela Valley Union High School District as the district exists following the effective date of reorganization pursuant to this section.

(2) All taxable property located within the Wiseburn Unified School District that was formerly part of the territory of the Centinela Valley Union High School District.

(d) In recognition of the authority for Centinela Valley Union High School District to continue levying property taxes on taxable property located within the Wiseburn Unified School District for repayment of bonds approved by voters before January 1, 2012, beginning on the effective date of reorganization of the Wiseburn School District by the formation of the Wiseburn Unified School
 District, the Centinela Valley Union High School District shall transfer to the Wiseburn Unified School District an amount equal to four million dollars ($4,000,000) from the proceeds of the sale of bonds approved by voters on November 2, 2010, and issued after January 1, 2012. The transfer shall be made from the proceeds of the sale of the first series of bonds issued after January 1, 2012, unless the Centinela Valley Union High School District elects to allocate the transfers to more than one series of bonds, in which case the transfers shall aggregate to the amount of four million dollars ($4,000,000). Proceeds transferred pursuant to this subdivision shall be expended by the Wiseburn Unified School District for purposes consistent with the original voter authorization for the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 730, Sec. 1.   (SB 477)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

35582.

(a) The bonding limit applicable to the Wiseburn Unified School District shall be equal to the sum of both of the following:

(1) The limit specified in Section 15106, as applied to all taxable real property within the Wiseburn Unified School District zoned for residential purposes of any classification by reference to the general plan of the County of Los Angeles or any other zoning ordinance applicable to the territory.

(2) The limit specified in Section 15102, as applied to all taxable property within the territory of the Wiseburn Unified School District other than real property zoned for residential purposes of any classification by reference to the general plan of the County of Los Angeles or any
 other zoning ordinance applicable to the territory.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 35543 or any other law, the bonding limit applicable to the Centinela Valley Union High School District shall be equal to the sum of both of the following:

(1) The limit specified in Section 15102, as applied to all taxable property within the Centinela Valley Union High School District.

(2) The limit specified in Section 15102, as applied to all taxable property within the territory of the Wiseburn Unified School District other than real property zoned for residential purposes of any classification by reference to the general plan of the County of Los Angeles or any other zoning ordinance applicable to the territory.

(c) The bonding limit applicable to bonds payable from ad
 valorem property taxes of a joint powers authority created by the Wiseburn School District and the Centinela Valley Union High School District or the two surviving school districts, acting together pursuant to the Joint Exercise of Powers Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code), shall be equal to the sum of the respective bonding limits applicable to the members of such authority.

(d) If the Local Public Schools Funding Authority created by the Wiseburn School District and the Centinela Valley Union High School District, or the two surviving school districts, acting together pursuant to the Joint Exercise of Powers Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code), maintains outstanding bonded indebtedness issued pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 15100), Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 15264), or Chapter 2 (commencing with
 Section 15300), of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1, the bonded indebtedness shall be allocated to the Wiseburn Unified School District and the Centinela Valley Union High School District, respectively, for purposes of the calculation of debt capacity pursuant to the bonding limits set forth in subdivisions (a) and (b), according to the following:

(1) As to bonds issued under authorizations approved by voters before January 1, 2018, including refunding bonds issued thereafter and related to such bonds, in proportionate amounts calculated based on the assessed value of taxable property within each respective school district securing repayment of the bonds.

(2) As to bonds issued under authorizations approved by voters following January 1, 2018, in appropriate amounts calculated based on the amount of proceeds of the bonds of such series expended for projects within each respective
 school district.

(e) This section does not prohibit the Wiseburn Unified School District or the Centinela Valley Union High School District from seeking a waiver pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 33050) of Chapter 1 of Part 20 of Division 2 or any other similar law of the bonding limits of this section or any other applicable statutory bonding limit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 101, Sec. 1.   (AB 2301)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

35584.

A pupil residing in the Wiseburn Unified School District who is eligible to attend any of grades 9 to 12, inclusive, may attend the Centinela Valley Union High School District without an interdistrict attendance agreement if the Centinela Valley Union High School District accepts that pupil for attendance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 730, Sec. 1.   (SB 477)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

35585.

Notwithstanding any other law, the election to approve the reorganization plan for the Wiseburn Unified School District shall be conducted within the territory of the Wiseburn School District, and shall be approved upon a favorable vote of a majority of all votes cast on the reorganization proposal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 730, Sec. 1.   (SB 477)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

35586.

The governing board of the Local Public Schools Funding Authority formed by the Wiseburn School District and the Centinela Valley Union High School District or the two surviving school districts, acting together pursuant to the Joint Exercise of Powers Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code), may proceed pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 15100), Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 15264), or Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 15300), of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1 on behalf of the joint powers authority that is created by and under the exclusive authority of its member school districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 730, Sec. 1.   (SB 477)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Reorganization of School Districts [35700. - 35787.]



  ARTICLE 1. Reorganization of School Districts by the Electorate [35700. - 35712.]

35700.

An action to reorganize one or more districts is initiated upon the filing, with the county superintendent of schools, of a petition to reorganize one or more school districts signed by any of the following:

(a) At least 25 percent of the registered voters residing in the territory proposed to be reorganized if the territory is inhabited. Where the petition is to reorganize territory in two or more school districts, the petition shall be signed by at least 25 percent of the registered voters in that territory in each of those districts.

(b) A number of registered voters residing in the territory proposed to be reorganized, equal to at least 8 percent of the votes cast for all candidates for Governor at the last gubernatorial election in the territory proposed to be reorganized, where the affected territory consists of a single school district with over 200,000 pupils in average daily attendance and the petition is to reorganize the district into two or more districts.

(c) The owner of the property, provided that territory is uninhabited and the owner thereof has filed either a tentative subdivision map with the appropriate county or city agency or an application for any project, as defined in Section 21065 of the Public Resources Code, with one or more local agencies.

(d) A majority of the members of the governing boards of each of the districts that would be affected by the proposed reorganization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 267, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

35700.1.

(a) A county superintendent of schools may do any of the following, as necessary, with respect to the reorganization of school districts within the jurisdiction of a county superintendent of schools:

(1) Before the initiation of an action to reorganize, a county superintendent of schools may do any of the following:

(A) Provide information, coordination, and guidance to potential petitioners for reorganization and to other parties inquiring about the petition process.

(B) Provide procedural advice and counseling.

(C) Provide information and assistance for community meetings, information sessions, and briefing sessions.

(D) Provide for coordination of media and community relations.

(2) A county superintendent of schools may perform the following duties for the processing and evaluation of multiple petitions to reorganize one or more school districts:

(A) Ensure compliance with all requirements pertaining to the petitions.

(B) Ensure compliance with all required timelines or deadlines for petitions.

(C) Apply new and preexisting evaluation criteria to the petition.

(3) A
 county superintendent of schools may provide assistance to reorganized districts during the interim period, as follows:

(A) To ensure smooth transitions with minimum disruption to pupils and staff.

(B) To provide advisory and consulting expertise on any of the following:

(i) Board and administrative policies and regulations.

(ii) Personnel policies.

(iii) Curriculum.

(iv) Instructional programs and services.

(v) Financial and budgeting functions.

(vi) Distribution of assets and liabilities.

(b) No funds appropriated in the annual Budget Act or another statute and allocated to the Los Angeles County Office of Education shall be used to instigate, solicit, or promote the development of plans to reorganize a school district or school districts within the jurisdiction of the county office of education, except that the funds may be used to support the research necessary to review and make recommendations regarding reorganization plans that are submitted to the county office of education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 186, Sec. 20.   (AB 2659)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

35700.3.

A petition filed under Section 35700 shall be required to reasonably identify the territory to be reorganized, which identification may include references to streets or prominent geographic features. The inclusion of legal descriptions or plat maps, or both, however, shall not be a prerequisite for the filing of a valid petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 906, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

35700.5.

Before initiating proceedings to consider any reorganization plan, the county committee on school district organization shall provide written notice of the proposed action to the local agency formation commission for the affected area.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 761, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

35701.

In any petition to reorganize school districts there shall be designated no more than three of the petitioners as chief petitioners for the purpose of receiving notice of any public hearings to be held on the petition.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

35702.

The persons securing the signatures to a petition of electors to reorganize school districts shall attach thereto an affidavit that all persons who signed the petition did so in the presence of the affiant and that each signature is a genuine signature of the person whose name it purports to be.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

35703.

Any petition filed under this article may include any of the appropriate provisions specified in Article 3 (commencing with Section 35730).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

35704.

The county superintendent of schools, within 30 days after any petition for reorganization is filed, shall examine the petition and, if he or she finds it to be sufficient and signed as required by law, transmit the petition simultaneously to the county committee and to the State Board of Education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1058, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

35705.

Within 60 days after receipt of the petition, the county committee shall hold one or more public hearings thereon at a regular or special meeting in each of the districts affected by the petition. Notice of the public hearing shall be given at least 10 days in advance thereof to not more than three persons designated in the petition as the chief petitioners, to the governing board of all districts affected by the proposed reorganization, and to all other persons requesting notice of the hearing.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

35705.5.

(a) The county committee may add to the petition any of the appropriate provisions specified in Article 3 (commencing with Section 35730) that were not included in the petition as filed and may amend any such provision that was so included.

(b) At least 10 days before the public hearing, or hearings, on the petition, the county committee shall make available to the public and to the governing boards affected by the petition a description of the petition, including all of the following:

(1) The rights of the employees in the affected districts to continued employment.

(2) The local control funding formula allocation pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03, per pupil, for each affected district and the effect of the petition, if approved, on that allocation.

(3) Whether the school districts involved will be governed, in part, by provisions of a city charter and, if so, in what way.

(4) Whether the governing boards of any proposed new district will have five or seven members.

(5) A description of the territory or school districts in which the election, if any, will be held.

(6) Where the proposal is to create two or more new districts, whether the proposal will be voted on as a single proposition.

(7) Whether the
 governing board of any new district will have trustee areas and, if so, whether the trustees will be elected by only the voters of that trustee area or by the voters of the entire school district.

(8) A description of how the property, obligations, and bonded indebtedness of original districts will be divided.

(9) A description of when the first governing board of any new district will be elected and how the terms of office for each new trustee will be determined.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 186, Sec. 21.   (AB 2659)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

35706.

(a) Within 120 days of the commencement of the first public hearing on the petition, the county committee shall recommend approval or disapproval of a petition to form one or more new districts or for the division of the entire territory of a school district into two or more new or acquiring districts, as the petition may be augmented, or shall approve or disapprove a petition for the transfer of territory, as the petition may be augmented. The county committee also shall approve or disapprove a petition to form one or more new districts if the conditions of subdivision (b) of Section 35710 are met.

(b) The 120-day period for approving or disapproving a petition pursuant to Section 35709 or 35710 shall commence after
 certification of an environmental impact report, approval of a negative declaration, or a determination that the project is exempt from the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 186, Sec. 22.   (AB 2659)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

35706.5.

(a) No action to reorganize a school district shall be initiated or completed without the consent of a majority of all of the members of the governing board of the affected district if both of the following conditions apply to the school district:

(1) It has obtained an emergency apportionment loan from the State of California, but the Superintendent has determined that a state administrator is no longer necessary, and has restored, before the effective date of this section, the legal rights, duties, and powers of the governing board of the school district pursuant to Section 41326.

(2) It has a pupil population 70
 percent of which is from either a “lower income household” or “very low income household” as those terms are defined in Sections 50079.5 and 50105, respectively, of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) For purposes of this section, for any school district that meets the description specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), consent to an action to reorganize the boundaries of the school district shall no longer be required when 10 years have elapsed from the date of final payment by the school district of the emergency loan to the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 186, Sec. 23.   (AB 2659)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

35707.

(a) Except for petitions for the transfer of territory, the county committee shall expeditiously transmit the petition to the State Board of Education together with its recommendations thereon. It shall also report whether any of the following, in the opinion of the committee, would be true regarding the proposed reorganization as described in the petition:

(1) It would adversely affect the school district organization of the county.

(2) It would comply with the provisions of Section 35753.

(b) Petitions for transfers of territory shall be transmitted pursuant to Section 35704.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1058, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

35708.

Except for a petition to form one or more new districts approved pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 35710, a petition transmitted pursuant to Section 35707, including the plans and recommendations included therein, if any, together with the recommended approval or disapproval and the plans and recommendations, if any, of the county committee shall be heard by the state board as provided in Article 4 (commencing with Section 35750).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 186, Sec. 24.   (AB 2659)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

35709.

If the following conditions are met, the county committee may approve the petition and order that the petition be granted, and shall so notify the county board of supervisors:

(a) The county committee finds that the conditions enumerated in paragraphs (1) to (10), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 35753 are substantially met, and:

(b) Either:

(1) The petition is to transfer uninhabited territory from one school district to another and the owner of the territory, or a majority of the owners of the territory, and the governing board of each affected district consents to the transfer; or

(2) The petition is to transfer inhabited territory of less than 10 percent of the assessed valuation of the school district from which the territory is being transferred, and the governing board of each affected district consents to the transfer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 186, Sec. 25.   (AB 2659)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

35710.

(a) For all other petitions to transfer territory, if the county committee finds that the conditions enumerated in paragraphs (1) to (10), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 35753 substantially are met, the county committee may approve the petition. If the petition is approved, the county committee shall notify the county superintendent of schools, who shall call an election in the territory of the affected districts, as determined by the county committee, to be conducted at the next election of any kind, in accordance with one of the following:

(1) Section 1002 of the Elections Code and Part 4 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 1 of Title 1 of this code.

(2) Division 4 (commencing with
 Section 4000) of the Elections Code.

(b) A county committee also may approve a petition to form one or more new districts if the requirements of subdivision (a), and the following conditions, are met:

(1) Each county superintendent of schools with jurisdiction over an affected district elects to grant approval authority to the county committee on school district organization for which he or she is secretary pursuant to Section 4012, and that county committee chooses to accept that authority.

(2) The governing board of each of the affected districts consents to the petition.

(3) The secretary of the county committee designated as the lead agency pursuant to Section 35710.3 enters into an agreement on behalf of the county committee for any or all affected
 districts to share among those districts the costs of complying with the requirements of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code).

(c) A petition to form one or more new districts that meets the conditions described in subdivision (b), but is not approved by the county committee, shall be transmitted to the state board pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 35707 and heard by the state board pursuant to Section 35708. The state board, rather than the county committee, shall be the lead agency, as defined in Section 21067 of the Public Resources Code, for purposes of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code) for each petition transmitted pursuant to this subdivision, including a petition disapproved by the county committee after determining the project is exempt from the California Environmental
 Quality Act pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 21080 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 30.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

35710.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an election may not be called to vote on a petition to transfer territory if the election area for that petition, as determined pursuant to Section 35732, is uninhabited territory as described in Section 35517. The county committee, if it approves that petition, shall order that the petition be granted and shall notify the county board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 344, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

35710.3.

A county committee shall be the lead agency, as defined in Section 21067 of the Public Resources Code, for purposes of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code) for each petition it considers pursuant to Sections 35709 and 35710, unless the state board is the lead agency pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 35710.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 314, Sec. 6.   (AB 174)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

35710.5.

(a) (1) An action by the county committee approving a petition pursuant to Section 35709, 35710, 35710.1, or paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 35722 may be appealed to the state board by the chief petitioners or one or more affected school districts. Except as provided in paragraph (2), the appeal shall be limited to issues of noncompliance with Section 35705, 35706, or 35710, or subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 35709. If an appeal is made as to the issue of whether the proposed transfer will adversely affect the racial or ethnic integration of the schools of the districts affected, it shall be made pursuant to Section 35711.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), an appeal for which notice of the appeal, pursuant to subdivision
 (b), was filed before July 1, 2020, shall be considered pursuant to this section, as it read on December 31, 2019.

(b) Within five days after the final action of the county committee, the appellant shall file with the county committee a notice of appeal and shall provide a copy to the county superintendent of schools, except that if the appellant is one of the affected school districts it shall have 30 days to file the notice of appeal with the county committee and provide a copy to the county superintendent. Upon the filing of the notice of appeal, the action of the county committee shall be stayed, pending the outcome of the appeal. Within 15 days after the filing of the notice of appeal, the appellant shall file with the county committee a statement of reasons and factual evidence. The county committee shall then, within 15 days of receipt of the statement, send to the state board the statement and the complete administrative record of the
 county committee proceedings, including minutes of the oral proceedings.

(c) Upon receipt of the appeal, the state board may either review the appeal or ratify the county committee’s decision by summarily denying review of the appeal. The board may review the appeal either solely on the administrative record or in conjunction with a public hearing. Following the review, the board shall affirm or reverse the action of the county committee, and if the petition will be sent to election, shall determine the territory in which the election is to be held. The board may reverse or modify the action of the county committee in any manner consistent with law.

(d) The decision of the state board shall be sent to the county superintendent of schools pursuant to Section 35755.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 301, Sec. 4.   (SB 1057)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

35710.51.

(a) The county superintendent of schools, within 35 days after receiving the notification provided by Section 35710, shall call an election, in the manner prescribed in Part 4 (commencing with Section 5000), to be conducted at the next election of any kind in accordance with either of the following:

(1) Section 1002 of the Elections Code and Part 4 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 1 of Title 1.

(2) Division 4 (commencing with Section 4000) of the Elections Code.

(b) The county superintendent of schools shall call the election in the territory
 of districts as determined by the county committee on school district organization, or, in the case of territory transfers appealed to the state board pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 35710.5, as determined by the state board. The county superintendent of schools shall not issue an order of election until after the time for an appeal pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 35710.5 has elapsed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 327, Sec. 5.   (AB 1599)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

35711.

(a) A person questioning the finding of the county committee pursuant to Section 35709, 35710, or paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 35722 that the action to transfer territory or form one or more new districts will not adversely affect the racial or ethnic integration of the schools of the districts affected, may appeal a decision based on that finding. The appeal shall be made to the state board within 30 days. The appeal shall be based upon factual and statistical evidence. The secretary of the state board shall expeditiously notify the county superintendent of schools upon the filing of the appeal. Upon the filing of the appeal, the action of the county committee shall be stayed, pending the outcome of the appeal.

(b) If the state board denies
 the appeal, the decision of the county committee shall stand. If the state board approves the appeal, it shall review the findings of the county committee at a regular meeting of the state board.

(c) The state board shall notify the county committee of its decision on the appeal. If the state board approves the appeal, the county committee shall transmit a copy of the proceedings to the state board within 30 days after receipt of notice. The state board shall review the transcript, considering all factors involved. The state board may reverse, or may affirm, the decision of the county committee, or if it appears that inadequate consideration was given to the effect of the transfer on integration of the schools of the school districts affected, it shall direct the county committee to reconsider its decision and for this purpose to hold another hearing.

(d) The secretary of the
 state board shall notify the county superintendent of schools of the state board’s final action regarding the appeal. If the action of the county committee to approve a territory transfer ultimately stands following the state board action, Section 35709 and subdivision (a) of Section 35710 shall apply, as appropriate.

(e) The county superintendent of schools shall not call an election pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 35710 until after the time for an appeal pursuant to subdivision (a) of this section has elapsed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 301, Sec. 5.   (SB 1057)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

35712.

The State Board of Education may adopt rules and regulations for the implementation of this article, as it deems necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1658, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. County Committee on School District Organization Plans and Recommendations for District Reorganization [35720. - 35724.]

35720.

Each county committee on school district organization shall, under the direction of the State Board of Education, formulate plans and recommendations for the organization of the districts in the county or any portion thereof including, if appropriate, a portion of one or more adjacent counties.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1192, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

35720.5.

(a) The county committee shall adopt a tentative recommendation following which action it shall hold one or more public hearings in the area proposed for reorganization at least 30 days before submission of a final recommendation for unification or other reorganization to the state board.

(b) The public hearing required by this section shall be called when both of the following conditions are met:

(1) Notice is sent to the governing board of each affected district at least 10 days before the hearing.

(2) Notice of the hearing is either published in a
 newspaper of general circulation or posted in every schoolhouse and at least three public places in the affected territory, school district, or school districts.

(c) The notice shall contain information as to the time, place, and purpose of the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 186, Sec. 28.   (AB 2659)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

35721.

(a) On receipt of a petition signed by at least 10 percent of the qualified electors residing in any district for a consideration of unification or other reorganization of any area, the county committee shall hold a public hearing on the petition at a regular or special meeting.

(b) On receipt of a petition signed by at least 5 percent of the qualified electors residing in a school district with over 200,000 pupils in average daily attendance in which the petition is to reorganize the district into two or more districts, the county committee shall hold a public hearing on the petition at a regular or special meeting.

(c) On receipt of a resolution approved by a majority of the members of a city council, county board of supervisors, governing body of a special district, or local agency formation commission that has jurisdiction over all or a portion of the school district for consideration of unification or other reorganization of any area, the county committee shall hold a public hearing on the proposal at a regular or special meeting.

(d) Following the hearing conducted pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), or (c), the county committee shall grant or deny the petition. If the county committee grants the petition, it shall adopt a tentative recommendation following which action it shall hold one or more public hearings in the area proposed for reorganization. The provisions of Sections 35705 and 35705.5 shall apply to any such public hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 761, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

35721.5.

Before initiating proceedings to consider any reorganization plan, the county committee on school district organization shall provide written notice of the proposed action to the local agency formation commission for the affected area.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 761, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

35722.

(a) Following the public hearing, or the last public hearing, required by Section 35720.5 or subdivision (d) of Section 35721, the county committee may adopt a final recommendation for unification or other reorganization and shall take one of the following actions:
